src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-iejgaat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - iejgát: # N_ODD
    iejgát+N+Sg+Nom: iejgát
    iejgát+N+Sg+Gen: iejgáda
    iejgát+N+Sg+Acc: iejgádav
    iejgát+N+Sg+Ill: iejgádij
    iejgát+N+Sg+Ine: iejgádin
    iejgát+N+Sg+Ela: [iejgádist, iejgádis]
    iejgát+N+Sg+Com: iejgádijn
    iejgát+N+Pl+Nom: iejgáda
    iejgát+N+Pl+Gen: iejgádij
    iejgát+N+Pl+Acc: iejgádijt
    iejgát+N+Pl+Ill: iejgádijda
    iejgát+N+Pl+Ine: iejgádijn
    iejgát+N+Pl+Ela: [iejgádijst, iejgádijs]
    iejgát+N+Pl+Com: [iejgádij, iejgádijgum]
    iejgát+N+Ess: iejgádin
    iejgát+N+Abe: iejgádahtá

 
 
